South Dakota, session 2026, SB82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-35:
An individual may not, directly or indirectly through statements or conduct,
intentionally misrepresent an animal in that individual's possession as a service animal in
any place of public accommodation to obtain any rights or privileges available to an
individual who qualifies for a service animal under state or federal law, knowing that the
individual is not entitled to those rights or privileges.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
For purposes of this section, "service animal" means a dog that is trained to do
work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a disability, as set forth in 28
C.F.R. § 36.104 (January 1, 2026), provided the work or tasks performed by the dog are
directly related to the individual's disability. The crime deterrent effects of a dog's
presence and the provision of emotional support, well-being, comfort, or companionship
do not constitute work or tasks.

26.257.12 2 82
An Act to prohibit the misrepresentation of an animal as a service animal and to provide a
penalty therefor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 82
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 82 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB82 ENROLLED